District of Columbia statutes.
32-606

Application.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit any of the rights or remedies provided under 42 U.S.C. § 2000e et seq., 29 U.S.C. § 206(d) , Chapter 14 of Title 2, or any other provisions of law relating to discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-162, § 7, 33 DCR 6684

History

1981 Ed., § 36-1106.

Prior Codifications